ko: 펌프 포함 액세서리: 공 압력계; 휴대용 가방; 호스; 공기 주입용 바늘; 사용 설명서; 윤활제; 노즐 어댑터; 교체용 O-링; 밸브 어댑터; 기타
ru: Аксессуары насоса: Манометр для мячей; Сумка для переноски; Шланг; Игла для накачивания; Инструкция по эксплуатации; Смазка; Насадка-переходник; Запасные уплотнительные кольца; Переходник для клапана; Другое
tr: Dahil olan pompa aksesuarları: Top basınç göstergesi; Taşıma çantası; Hortum; Şişirme iğnesi; Kullanım kılavuzu; Yağlayıcı; Başlık adaptörü; Yedek O-ring'ler; Valf adaptörü; Diğer
pt-PT: Acessórios da bomba incluídos: Manómetro de pressão para bolas; Saco de transporte; Tubo; Agulha de enchimento; Manual de instruções; Lubrificante; Adaptador de bocal; O-rings de substituição; Adaptador de válvula; Outros
hr-HR: Uključeni pribor za pumpu: Manometar za loptu; Torba za nošenje; Crijevo; Igla za napuhavanje; Priručnik s uputama; Mazivo; Adapter za mlaznicu; Zamjenski O-prstenovi; Adapter za ventil; Ostalo
hu: Pumpa mellékelt tartozékai: Labdanyomás-mérő; Hordtáska; Tömlő; Fújótű; Használati útmutató; Kenőanyag; Fúvókaadapter; Csere O-gyűrűk; Szelepadapter; Egyéb
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ αντλίας: Μανόμετρο μπάλας; Τσάντα μεταφοράς; Λάστιχο; Βελόνα φουσκώματος; Εγχειρίδιο οδηγιών; Λιπαντικό; Προσαρμογέας ακροφυσίου; Ανταλλακτικά O-rings; Προσαρμογέας βαλβίδας; Άλλο
sv: Medföljande tillbehör för pump: Tryckmätare för bollar; Bärväska; Slang; Pumpnål; Bruksanvisning; Smörjmedel; Munstycksadapter; Extra O-ringar; Ventiladapter; Övrigt
pl: Dołączone akcesoria do pompki: Ciśnieniomierz do piłek; Torba transportowa; Wężyk; Igła do pompowania; Instrukcja obsługi; Smar; Adapter do dyszy; Zapasowe o-ringi; Adapter do zaworu; Inne
zh-TW: 包含泵浦配件: 球壓計; 提袋; 軟管; 充氣針; 說明手冊; 潤滑劑; 氣嘴轉接頭; 替換用 O 型環; 氣門轉接頭; 其他
ja: ポンプアクセサリー付き: ボール圧力計; キャリーバッグ; ホース; 空気針; 取扱説明書; 潤滑剤; ノズルアダプター; 交換用 O リング; バルブアダプター; その他
fr: Accessoires de pompe inclus: Manomètre pour ballon; Sac de transport; Tuyau; Aiguille de gonflage; Manuel d’instructions; Lubrifiant; Adaptateur d’embout; Joints toriques de rechange; Adaptateur de valve; Autre
cs: Přiložené příslušenství pumpy: Tlakoměr na míče; Přepravní taška; Hadička; Jehla na huštění; Návod k použití; Mazivo; Adaptér na trysky; Náhradní O-kroužky; Adaptér na ventilek; Jiné
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за помпа: Манометър за топка; Чанта за носене; Маркуч; Игла за помпане; Ръководство за употреба; Смазка; Адаптер за накрайник; Резервни О-пръстени; Адаптер за вентил; Друго
fi: Mukana tulevat pumpun lisävarusteet: Pallon painemittari; Kantolaukku; Letku; Täyttöneula; Käyttöohje; Voiteluaine; Suutinsovitin; Vaihto-O-renkaat; Venttiilisovitin; Muu
es: Accesorios de la bomba incluidos: Manómetro de balones; Bolsa de transporte; Manguera; Aguja de inflado; Manual de instrucciones; Lubricante; Adaptador de boquilla; Juntas tóricas de repuesto; Adaptador de válvula; Otro
en: Pump accessories included: Ball pressure gauge; Carrying bag; Hose; Inflation needle; Instruction manual; Lubricant; Nozzle adapter; Replacement O-rings; Valve adapter; Other
vi: Phụ kiện máy bơm đi kèm: Đồng hồ đo áp suất bóng; Túi đựng; Vòi bơm; Kim bơm hơi; Sổ tay hướng dẫn; Chất bôi trơn; Đầu chuyển đổi vòi bơm; Vòng đệm chữ O thay thế; Đầu chuyển đổi van; Khác
nb: Inkludert pumpetilbehør: Balltrykksmåler; Bæreveske; Slange; Pumpenål; Bruksanvisning; Smøremiddel; Dyseadapter; Reserve-O-ringer; Ventiladapter; Annet
sk-SK: Príslušenstvo k čerpadlu v cene: Tlakomer na lopty; Prenosná taška; Hadica; Ihla na hustenie; Návod na obsluhu; Mazivo; Adaptér na dýzu; Náhradné O-krúžky; Adaptér na ventil; Iné
it: Accessori per la pompa inclusi: Manometro per palloni; Borsa per il trasporto; Tubo flessibile; Ago di gonfiaggio; Manuale di istruzioni; Lubrificante; Adattatore per ugello; O-ring di ricambio; Adattatore per valvola; Altro
zh-CN: 包括打气筒配件: 气压计; 收纳袋; 软管; 充气针; 说明书; 润滑剂; 气嘴转换器; 替换 O 型圈; 气门嘴转换器; 其他
de: Enthaltenes Pumpenzubehör: Ball-Druckmesser; Tragetasche; Schlauch; Pumpennadel; Bedienungsanleitung; Schmiermittel; Düsenadapter; Ersatz-O-Ringe; Ventiladapter; Sonstige
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมที่รวมมาพร้อมปั๊ม: เกจวัดแรงดันลูกบอล; กระเป๋าพกพา; สายยาง; เข็มสูบลม; คู่มือการใช้งาน; สารหล่อลื่น; อะแดปเตอร์หัวฉีด; โอริงสำรอง; อะแดปเตอร์วาล์ว; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Accesorii pentru pompă incluse: Manometru pentru minge; Geantă de transport; Furtun; Ac de umflare; Manual de instrucțiuni; Lubrifiant; Adaptor pentru duză; Garnituri inelare (O-ring) de rezervă; Adaptor pentru valvă; Altele
sl-SI: Vključeni dodatki za črpalko: Merilnik tlaka za žoge; Torba za prenašanje; Cev; Igla za napihovanje; Navodila za uporabo; Mazivo; Nastavek za šobo; Nadomestni O-obročki; Adapter za ventil; Drugo
pt-BR: Bomba, acessórios incluídos: Manômetro para bola; Bolsa de transporte; Mangueira; Agulha de inflar; Manual de instruções; Lubrificante; Adaptador de bico; Anéis de vedação (O-rings) de reposição; Adaptador de válvula; Outro
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys pompos priedai: Kamuolių slėgio matuoklis; Nešiojimo krepšys; Žarna; Pūtimo adata; Naudojimo instrukcija; Tepalas; Antgalio adapteris; Atsarginiai sandarinimo žiedai; Vožtuvo adapteris; Kita
da: Medfølgende pumpetilbehør: Boldtryksmåler; Bæretaske; Slange; Pumpenål; Brugsanvisning; Smøremiddel; Dyseadapter; Ekstra O-ringe; Ventiladapter; Andet
nl: Inbegrepen pompaccessoires: Balspanningsmeter; Draagtas; Slang; Oppompnaald; Gebruiksaanwijzing; Smeermiddel; Mondstukadapter; Vervangende O-ringen; Ventieladapter; Overig